Louisiana, session 2026, HB614.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 47:305.82 is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§305.82. Rebate; state sales tax; purchases of lodging services and meals for
persons performing disaster or emergency-related work; termination
A. This Section shall be known and may be cited as the "No Tax on
Recovery Act."
B. For purposes of this Section, the following terms shall have the meanings
ascribed to them in this Subsection:
(1) "Declared state disaster or emergency" shall have the meaning ascribed
in R.S. 47:53.5.
Page 1 of 5
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1105 ENGROSSED
HB NO. 614
(2) "Disaster or emergency-related work" shall have the meaning ascribed
in R.S. 47:53.5.
(3) "Disaster rebate eligibility period" means the ten-day period beginning
on the first day of a declared state disaster or emergency.
(4) "Qualifying business" means any utility that deploys personnel to
perform disaster or emergency-related work in this state during a disaster rebate
eligibility period.
(5) "Utility" shall have the meaning ascribed in R.S. 51:3271.
C.(1) Subject to the limitations provided in Paragraph (2) of this Subsection,
there shall be allowed a rebate for the actual amount of state sales tax paid by a
qualifying business on purchases of any of the following:
(a) Lodging services described in R.S. 47:301.3(1) when the services are
used during a disaster rebate eligibility period by any person who performs disaster
or emergency-related work in connection with a declared state disaster or emergency.
(b) Prepared meals furnished during a disaster rebate eligibility period to any
person who performs disaster or emergency-related work in connection with a
declared state disaster or emergency.
(2) No purchase of lodging or meals shall be eligible for the rebate provided
for in this Subsection unless the amount of the purchase is within the applicable per
diem rate limit for federal employee travel expenses established and promulgated by
the General Services Administration.
C. To claim the rebate, a qualifying business shall apply to the secretary of
the Department of Revenue in a manner and on a form prescribed by the secretary.
The applicant shall submit proof of the actual state sales tax amounts paid on the
purchases described in Subsection B of this Section and any other documentation
required by administrative rule.
E. The secretary of the Department of Revenue shall determine each
applicant's eligibility for the rebate. If the secretary subsequently finds that a rebate
recipient is ineligible for the rebate, the secretary may recapture the rebate amount
Page 2 of 5
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1105 ENGROSSED
HB NO. 614
through any procedure authorized in law or administrative rule. A rebate amount
subject to recapture shall be an obligation to be collected and accounted for in the
same manner as if it were a tax due to the secretary.
F. The secretary of the Department of Revenue may promulgate rules in
accordance with the Administrative Procedure Act as are necessary to implement the
provisions of this Section. The rules may include provisions related to the recapture
of a rebate amount from any recipient found to be ineligible for the rebate,
documentation requirements, means of verifying deployments, and any other
procedures necessary for administering the rebate.
G.(1) The total amount of rebates granted pursuant to the provisions of this
Section shall not exceed fifty-five thousand dollars per calendar year.
(2) The granting of rebates authorized by this Section shall be on a
first-come, first-served basis. If the total amount of rebates requested in a particular
calendar year exceeds the total rebate amount authorized for that year, the
Department of Revenue shall treat the excess as having been applied for on the first
day of the subsequent year. The department shall treat all requests received on the
same business day as received at the same time. If the aggregate amount of the
requests received on a single business day exceeds the rebate amount available, the
department shall approve rebates on a pro rata basis.
H. No rebate shall be paid on or after January 1, 2032.